Massachusetts, session 194th, H1870.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 254 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by striking out section 8 and inserting in place thereof the following section:-
Section 8. Liens under sections two and four shall be dissolved unless the contractor,
subcontractor, or some person claiming by, through or under them, not later than the earliest of:
(i) ninety days after the filing or recording of the notice of substantial completion under section
two A; (ii) one hundred and twenty days after the filing or recording of the notice of termination
under section two B; (iii) one hundred and twenty days after the last day a person, entitled to
enforce a lien under section two or anyone claiming by, through or under him, performed or
furnished labor or material or both labor and materials or furnished rental equipment, appliances
or tools; or (iv), with respect to any building, structure or other improvement to real property
of 2

consisting only of at least one but not more than four dwelling units, five years after the filing or
recording of the Notice of Contract, provided that the homeowner has filed an affidavit with the
registry of deeds in the county or district where the land lies stating that the homeowner is
unaware of any outstanding debt to any contractor or subcontractor, shall file or record in the
registry of deeds in the county or district where the land lies a statement, giving a just and true
account of the amount due or to become due him, with all just credits, a brief description of the
property, and the names of the owners set forth in the notice of contract. A lien under section one
shall be dissolved unless a like statement, giving the names of the owner of record at the time the
work was performed or at the time of filing the statement, is filed or recorded in the appropriate
registry of deeds within the ninety days provided in said section. Nothing in this section shall
prohibit the filing or recording of a statement under this section prior to the filing or recording of
the notices under section two A or two B.
of 2